Washington statutes.
RCW 19.275.030

Pyramid scheme—Prohibition.

(1) No person may establish, promote, operate, or participate in any pyramid scheme.

(2) A limitation as to the number of persons who may participate, or the presence of additional conditions affecting eligibility for the opportunity to receive compensation under the scheme, does not change the identity of the scheme as a pyramid scheme.

(3) It is not a defense under chapter 65, Laws of 2006 that a person, on giving consideration, obtains goods, services, or intangible property in addition to the right to receive compensation, nor is it a defense to designate the consideration a gift, donation offering, or other word of similar meaning.

[ 2006 c 65 s 3.]